Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-108
Pulaski's Memorial Day; proclamation; observance.

The Governor of the State of Nebraska is authorized and directed to issue a proclamation calling upon the officials of the state government and subdivisions thereof in local communities to display the flag of the United States on all public buildings on October 11 of each year and inviting the people of the State of Nebraska to observe the day in schools and other suitable places, with appropriate ceremonies, in commemoration of the death of Brigadier General Casimir Pulaski.

Laws 1931, c. 94, § 1, p. 263;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-110;

R.S.1943, § 84-108.